Washington statutes.
RCW 36.75.280

Centralized repair and storage of machinery, equipment, supplies, etc.

All county road machinery, equipment, stores, and supplies, excepting stockpiles and other road building material, shall while not in use be stored and repaired at one centralized point in each county: PROVIDED, That if the geography, topography, distance, or other valid economic considerations require more than one place for storage or repairs, the county commissioners may, by unanimous vote, authorize the same.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.75.280. Prior: 1949 c 156 s 4; Rem. Supp. 1949 s 6450-8d.]